Maine, session 132, LD1259.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA c. 415 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 415
AGREEMENTS WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
AUTHORITIES
§3891. Agreements with federal immigration enforcement authorities
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 4751,
subsection 1.
B. "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 4751,
subsection 2.
2. Prohibition on agreements with federal immigration enforcement authorities.
A law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer may not enter into a written or oral
contract, agreement or arrangement that grants federal immigration enforcement authority
or powers to the law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer, including an
agreement pursuant to 8 United States Code, Section 1357(g).